Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 336.495 is amended to read:
336.495. [ (1) The Department of Education shall develop a form for public education programs to
use when a student has been diagnosed with a concussion or other brain injury. ]
[(2) The form  required under this section must describe academic accommodations that a public
education program may make for a  student who has been diagnosed with a concussion or other brain
injury. The  accommodations must be optional for a public education program to provide and must be
nonmedical.]
[(3)(a) The department must distribute the form developed  under this section to public education
programs.]
[(b) The department must make the form developed under this section available for use by educators
and other program employees, students, parents and guardians. ]
[(4)(a) A public education program must make the form developed under this section available  as
soon as practicable to an educator, a program employee, a student, a parent or a guardian when: ]
[(A) The public education program  receives notice that a student has been diagnosed with a
concussion or other brain injury; or ]
[(B) Requested by an educator, a program employee, a student, a parent or a guardian. ]
[(b) Nothing in this subsection requires a public education program to provide any or  all of the
academic accommodations described on the form. ]
[(5) The State Board of Education may adopt any rules necessary for the implementation of  this
section.]
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care professional” means a person who is licensed or registered under  the
laws of this state as a physician, a chiropractic physician, a  naturopathic physician, a psy-
chologist, a  physical therapist, an occupational therapist, a physician associate or a nurse
practitioner.
(b) “Public education provider” means a school district, a public charter school or  an
education service district.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall establish a procedure for public education  pro-
viders to use to develop and implement an immediate and temporary  accommodations plan
for a student who has been diagnosed with a concussion  or other brain injury by a health
Enrolled House Bill 3007 (HB 3007-B) Page 1
care professional to ensure the safety and recovery of the student and to reduce the risk of
reinjury or additional injury to the student.
(b) The department shall prepare a sample form, and include written instructions for the
sample form, to assist public education  providers in following the procedure to develop and
implement an immediate and temporary accommodations plan.
(3) Upon receiving written notification from a  parent or guardian that a student has been
diagnosed with a concussion or other brain injury by a health care professional  and that
accommodations are being requested, a public education provider shall initiate the  procedure
to develop and implement an immediate and temporary accommodations plan.
(4) The  procedure to develop and implement an immediate and temporary accommo-
dations plan shall be used by a public education provider to:
(a) Determine if immediate physical activity limitations  are necessary to ensure the
safety and recovery of the student and to minimize the risk of reinjury or  additional injury
to the student, including  activities such as physical education, recess, unstructured play and
similar activities provided by or sponsored through the public education provider that involve
running, jumping, climbing, throwing, catching or  other movements that pose a risk of falls,
collisions or physical  injury. The public education provider shall implement any immediate
physical activity limitations determined to be necessary.
(b) Describe present challenges and symptoms  associated with the student’s concussion
or other brain injury.
(c) Identify and  implement immediate and temporary academic, social-emotional, behav-
ioral or other necessary accommodations determined to  be appropriate for the student to
support meaningful participation in educational  activities at a level that is appropriate for
the student’s recovery.
(d) Communicate accommodations identified under paragraph (c)  of this subsection with:
(A) All teachers who provide instruction to the student; and
(B) Other employees of the public education provider who have  regular responsibilities
for the student’s supervision  or health, including school nurses, counselors, physical educa-
tion teachers,  coaches, athletic trainers and staff supervising recess or other physical ac-
tivities.
(e) Ensure that the accommodations identified under  paragraph (c) of this subsection
are:
(A) In effect no later than 10 school days after written notification has been received by
the public education provider regarding the concussion or other brain injury; and
(B) Reviewed as needed, but no  later than every two months, based on the student’s re-
covery.
(5) The department shall make available to all public  education providers the procedure
and sample form developed under this section.
SECTION 2.
The amendments to ORS 336.495 by section 1 of this  2025 Act first apply to
the 2025-2026 school year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 3007 (HB 3007-B) Page 2
Passed by House April 15, 2025
Repassed by House May 29, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 27, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3007 (HB 3007-B) Page 3